src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON METTUMforms !!≈ **@CODE@** 
+A+Attr: K ;
+A: X_LITTER_SG ;
+A: X_eh_PL ;
+A+Cmp/Attr: ATTR_R ;
+A:%> A_VUOTA ;
+A: A_ADV ;

!LEXICON AS_SUF    __@CODE@__ 
!+Sg+Gen:á^RVSH K ;
!+Sg+Acc:á^RVSH K ;
!+Sg+Ill:ž%>ân K ;
!+Sg+Loc:á%>st K ;
!+Sg+Com:%>jn K ;
!+Ess:%>âžžân K ;
!+Par:%>âžžâd K ;
!+Pl+Nom:%>áh K ;
!+Pl+Gen:%>j K ;
!+Pl+Acc:%>id K ;
!+Pl+Ill:%>id K ;
!+Pl+Loc:%>in K ;
!+Pl+Com:%>j GUIN ;
!+Pl+Abe:%>jttáá K ;



!! ## Der/Comp+Aarision
! -----------
 
 
LEXICON COMPe !!≈ * **@CODE@** NUORA uses this lexicon
+Der1+Der/Comp+A: COMP-SUF ;
+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:âš K ; !needs lexicon
+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:beht K ; !čepibeht	čeppi čeepib čepibeht


LEXICON VVCOMPe !!≈ * **@CODE@** ALKKEE uses this lexicon; giving älkkeb etc.
+Der1+Der/Comp+A: VVCOMP-SUF ;
:p^RLEN P-COMP-ERR-ORTH ;
+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:b%>âš K ; !needs lexicon



LEXICON COMPclen !!≈ * **@CODE@** NUORA uses this lexicon
+Der1+Der/Comp+A: COMP-SUFclen ;
+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:âš K ; !needs lexicon
+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:eht K ; !ucebeht	ucce ucceeb ucebeht


LEXICON CCOMPe !!≈ * **@CODE@** STYERES and MUOTTII use this lexicon
+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth:âb CCOMP-SUF ;
+Der1+Der/Comp+A:b CCOMP-SUF ;
+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:bâš K ; !needs lexicon


LEXICON eCOMP !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Der1+Der/Comp+A: eCOMP-SUF ;
+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:beht K ; !lämibeht xxx perhaps ^RLEN^SLEN

!LEXICON COMP  __@CODE@__
!+Der1+Der/Comp+A:b COMP-SUF ;
!+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:beht K ; !čepibeht	čeppi čeepib čepibeht
 
LEXICON COMPo !!≈ * **@CODE@** NJUORAS, NJAALGIS uses this lexicon
+Der1+Der/Comp+A: oCOMP-SUF ;
+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:bbooht K ; !vijđásubbooht


LEXICON eCOMP-SUF  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
!+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:eb K ;
 :b COMP-SUF ;

LEXICON oCOMP-SUF  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Attr: K ;
+Sg+Nom:b K ;
+Sg+Gen:b K ;
+Sg+Acc:b K ;
+Sg+Ill:b%>on K ; !
+Sg+Loc:bb%>oost K ;
+Sg+Com:bb%>oin K ; ! XXX
+Sg+Abe:b%>ttáá K ;
+Ess:bb%>on K ; 
+Ess+Err/Orth:b%>on K ; 
+Par:bb%>od K ;  !X_h_PL
+Pl+Nom:b%>oh K ;
+Pl+Gen:b%>oi K ;
+Pl+Acc:b%>oid K ;
+Pl+Ill:bb%>oid K ;
+Pl+Loc:b%>oin K ;
+Pl+Com:b%>oi GUIN ;
+Pl+Abe:b%>oittáá K ;


LEXICON CCOMP-SUF  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  STYERES uses this lexicon
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Sg+Gen: K ;
+Sg+Acc: K ;
+Sg+Ill:^SLEN%>ân K ;
+Sg+Loc:^SLEN%>ist K ;
+Sg+Com:^SLEN%>áin K ;
+Sg+Abe:%>ttáá K ;
+Ess:^SLEN%>in K ;
+Par:^SLEN%>id K ;
 :^SLEN X_eh_PL ;
+Err/Orth: X_eh_PL ;


LEXICON COMP-SUF  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom:^RLEN^SLEN K ;
+Sg+Gen:^RLEN^SLEN K ;
+Sg+Acc:^RLEN^SLEN K ;
COMP_SUF_ADVLCASE ;

LEXICON COMP_SUF_ADVLCASE
+Sg+Ill:^RVSH^SVSH%>ân K ; ! RVSH added in this row because of LAAMI; lämibân, lämibist; does not harm the rest where COMPe is used with a short 1.syll. vowel
+Sg+Loc:^RVSH^SVSH%>ist K ;
+Sg+Com:^RVSH^SVSH%>áin K ;
+Sg+Abe:^RLEN%>ttáá K ;
+Ess:^RVSH^SVSH%>in K ;
+Par:^RVSH^SVSH%>id K ;
 X_eh_PL ;


LEXICON VVCOMP-SUF  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Attr:b^RLEN K ;
+Sg+Nom:b^RLEN K ;
+Sg+Gen:b^RLEN K ;
+Sg+Acc:b^RLEN K ;
+Sg+Ill:^SV^SLENb%>ân K ;
+Sg+Loc:^SV^SLENb%>ist K ;
+Sg+Com:^SV^SLENb%>áin K ;
+Sg+Abe:b^RLEN%>ttáá K ;
+Ess:^SV^SLENb%>in K ;
+Par:^SV^SLENb%>id K ;
 :^SV^SLENb X_eh_PL ;


LEXICON COMP-SUFclen  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Attr:^CLEN^SLEN K ;
+Sg+Nom:^CLEN^SLEN K ;
+Sg+Gen:^CLEN^SLEN K ;
+Sg+Acc:^CLEN^SLEN K ;
+Sg+Ill:%>ân K ;
+Sg+Loc:%>ist K ;
+Sg+Com:%>áin K ;
+Sg+Abe:^CLEN^SLEN%>ttáá K ;
+Ess:%>in K ;
+Par:%>id K ;
 X_eh_PL ;

 
LEXICON SUP_MUS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+A: MUS ;

LEXICON SUP_MUSJ  !!≈ * **@CODE@** majemuš
+A: MUSj ;


LEXICON MUS !!≈ * **@CODE@**  asdf
+Der1+Der/Superl+A: MUS-SUF ;
+Der1+Der/Superl+A+Attr:mus K ;
+Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:mus%>ávt K ;
+Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:mus%>âht K ;
+Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der4+Der/taa+Adv:mus%>táá K ; !pyeremustáá

LEXICON MUSj !!≈ * **@CODE@** SUP_MUSJ uses this lexicon, eg. majemuš
+Der1+Der/Superl+A: MUSj-SUF ;
+Der1+Der/Superl+A+Attr:muš K ;
+Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:muš%>ávt K ;


LEXICON CMUS !!≈ * **@CODE@**  STYERES uses this lexicon
+Der1+Der/Superl+A: CMUS-SUF ;
+Der1+Der/Superl+A+Attr:mus K ;
+Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:mus%>ávt K ;


LEXICON MOS !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Der1+Der/Superl+A:mos X_LITTER ;
+Der1+Der/Superl+A+Attr:mos K ;
+Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:mos%>ávt K ;

LEXICON MUS-SUF !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Attr:mus K ;
+Sg+Nom:mus K ;
+Sg+Gen:muu K ;
+Sg+Acc:muu K ;
+Sg+Ill:musân K ;
+Sg+Loc:muust K ;
+Sg+Com:muin K ;
+Sg+Abe:muuttáá K ;
+Ess:mussân K ;
+Par:mussâd K ;
+Pl+Nom:muuh K ;
+Pl+Gen:mui K ;
+Pl+Acc:muid K ; !7 stuárráámussáid 6 stuárráámusâid
+Pl+Ill:muid K ;
!+Pl+Ill:%>ááid K ;
+Pl+Loc:muin K ;
+Pl+Com:mui GUIN ;
+Pl+Abe:muittáá K ;
+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:musah K ; !in corp
+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:musâi K ;
+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:musâid K ;
+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:musâid K ;
+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:musâin K ;
+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:muigijn K ;

LEXICON MUSj-SUF !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Attr:muš K ;
+Sg+Nom:muš K ;
+Sg+Gen:muu K ;
+Sg+Acc:muu K ;
+Sg+Ill:mužân K ;
+Sg+Loc:muust K ;
+Sg+Com:muin K ;
+Sg+Abe:muuttáá K ;
+Ess:mužžân K ;
+Par:mužžâd K ;
+Pl+Nom:muuh K ;
+Pl+Gen:mui K ;
+Pl+Acc:muid K ;
+Pl+Ill:muid K ;
!+Pl+Ill:%>ááid K ;
+Pl+Loc:muin K ;
+Pl+Com:mui GUIN ;
+Pl+Abe:muittáá K ;
+Cmp/SgNom:muš R ;
+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:mušah K ;
+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:mušâi K ;
+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:mušâid K ;
+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:mušâid K ;
+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:mušâijgijn K ;

LEXICON CMUS-SUF !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Attr:mus K ;
+Sg+Nom:mus K ;
+Sg+Gen:muu K ;
+Sg+Acc:muu K ;
+Sg+Ill:musân K ;
+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:mui K ;
+Sg+Loc:muust K ;
+Sg+Com:muin K ;
+Sg+Abe:muuttáá K ;
+Ess:mussân K ;
+Ess+Err/Orth:mužžân K ;
+Par+Err/Orth:mužžâd K ;
+Par:mussâd K ;
+Pl+Nom:muuh K ;
+Pl+Gen:mui K ;
+Pl+Acc:muid K ; !7 stuárráámussáid 6 stuárráámusâid
+Pl+Ill:muid K ;
!+Pl+Ill:%>ááid K ;
+Pl+Loc:muin K ;
+Pl+Com:mui GUIN ;
+Pl+Abe:muittáá K ;
+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:musah K ;
+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:musâi K ;
+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:musâid K ; !7 stuárráámussáid 6 stuárráámusâid
+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:mussáid K ;
+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:musâin K ;
+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:muigijn K ;
+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:musâi GUIN ;
+Pl+Abe+Err/Orth:musâittáá K ;

LEXICON P-COMP-ERR-ORTH !!≈ **@CODE@** 
+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: K ;
+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth: K ;
+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: K ;


LEXICON A_VUOTA  !!≈ * **@CODE@** for derivation
+Der3+Der/vuota:#vuot^RCâ FLAG_2KIELA ;
+Der3+Der/vuota+Err/Orth:#vuodâ FLAG_2KIELA ;
+Der3+Der/vuota+Err/Orth:#vuodâ FLAG_2KIELA ;

LEXICON FLAG_2KIELA  !!≈ * **@CODE@** @C.NeedNoun@
@C.NeedNoun@ 2KIELA ;

LEXICON A_ADV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** for derivation
+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:ávt K ; !pyeremusávt
+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv+Err/Orth:avt K ; !

!LEXICON COMPA_ADV  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ for derivation
!+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:oht K ; !vijđásubbooht


!LEXICON A_ADV_VAANIS  _ for derivation
!+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:ht K ; !vääniht


LEXICON A_LAGAN  !!≈ * **@CODE@** for derivation
+Der1+Der2+Der/laakan:# LAGAN ;

LEXICON A_LASJ   !!≈ **@CODE@** 
@U.Cap.Opt@+Der1+Der/lasj:@U.Cap.Opt@l ANOLASJ ; 

LEXICON ATTR_R  !!≈ **@CODE@** sends to R, NAMAG, SAS, CMP_ADJ.
 R ;
 NAMAG ;
 SAS ;
 CMP_ADJ ;


!! # Derivation

LEXICON NAMAG !!≈ * **@CODE@** gives »»» and directs to NAMAG, both from adj and numerals
+Cmp#:»»# NAMAGCont ;
!#:»»# NAMATLAGANLAGASCont ;

LEXICON SAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** , both from adj and numerals
+Cmp#:»»# SASCont ;

 
LEXICON NAMAGCont!!≈ * **@CODE@**
tääsi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Plc:tááság DER-AG ; ! tags_via_apertium
čiehâ+Sem/Plc:čievâg DER-AG ; ! tags_via_apertium
jienâ+Sem/Body-abstr_Prod-audio_Semcon:jienâg DER-AG ; ! tags_via_apertium
lonnjâ+Sem/Buildpart:loonjâg DER-AG ; ! tags_via_apertium
čuárvi+Sem/Body_Mat:čuárvág DER-AG ; ! tags_via_apertium
uáivi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Body_Plc-elevate:uáivág DER-AG ; ! tags_via_apertium
njälmi+Sem/Body:njáálmág DER-AG ; ! tags_via_apertium
kerdi+Sem/Plc_Time:kiärdág DER-AG ; ! tags_via_apertium
