src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON AdjectiveRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@** is the list of adjectives
ucemus:uce SUP_MUS ; !YAML
mädimus:mädi SUP_MUS "eteläisin" ;
pajemus:paje SUP_MUS "ylimmäinen" ;
alemus:ale SUP_MUS "ylin" ;
vyelemus:vyele SUP_MUS "alin" ;
revnimus:revni SUP_MUS "reunimmainen" ;
robdâmus:robdâ SUP_MUS "äärimmäinen" ;
tabemus:tabe SUP_MUS "tuonnimmainen" ;
ovdemuš:ovde SUP_MUSJ "etummainen" ;
ponemus:pone SUP_MUS "pohjimmainen" ;
täbimus:täbi SUP_MUS "tännimmäinen" ;
koskâmus:koskâ SUP_MUS ;
aldemus+Err/Orth:alde SUP_MUSJ "" ; !from bidix and corp; MLO: errative should be aldemus
aldemus:alde SUP_MUS "" ; !
eđâmus:eđâ SUP_MUS ; !SUP_MUS
majemuš:maje SUP_MUSJ ; !YAML
ponemuš:pone SUP_MUSJ ;	
robdâmuš:robdâ SUP_MUSJ ;	
tabemuš:tabe SUP_MUSJ ;    ! ii attr	
tolemus:tole SUP_MUS ; !
tavemus:tave SUP_MUS ;
täbimuš:täbi SUP_MUSJ ;
